Utah statutes.
63G-6-410.   Circumstances justifying award of contract without competition.

A contract may be awarded for a supply, service, or construction item without competition when, under rules and regulations, the chief procurement officer, the head of a purchasing agency, or a designee of either officer above the level of procurement officer determines in writing that:

(1)  there is only one source for the required supply, service, or construction item; or

(2)  the award to a specific supplier, service provider, or contractor is a condition of a donation that will fund the full cost of the supply, service, or construction item.

